Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 Tennessee Veterinary Practice Act
63-12-121. Renewal of license — Disposition of fines and fees — Expenses — Retirement.

All persons who are now or may hereafter be licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall renew such license as follows:

Each year, the secretary-treasurer of the board shall mail an application for renewal of license to every person holding a valid current license;

The applicant shall fill in the application and return it to the secretary-treasurer of the board;

The applicant shall furnish the board such evidence as it may require of having complied with provisions pursuant to this chapter relating to the annual educational program;

The annual renewal fee shall be set by the board and shall be paid at the time the application for renewal of license is filed;

If any holder of a license fails to renew the license within sixty (60) days after registration becomes due, as provided in this section, the license or certificate of such person shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of the sixty (60) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing unless requested;

However, during any war or national emergency, the holder of a license on active duty with the armed services shall not be required to renew the license until January 1 of the year following the date of the holder's release from such active duty; and

The acceptance of any fee by the board shall not in any way affect the board's powers or duties with respect to the revocation, suspension or refusal to grant any license.

All fines for offenses for the violation of this chapter shall be paid over to the board and shall become a part of the receipts of the board. All money received by the board shall be paid into the state treasury and become a part of the general fund of the state. The budget director shall make such allotments out of the general fund as the budget director may deem proper for the necessary expenses of the board, and no expenditure shall be made by the board unless and until such allotment has been made by the budget director. Such allotments shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of this state.

Any person licensed to practice veterinary medicine who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in the practice of veterinary medicine in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet continuing education requirements as set by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (d).

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 63-1221; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 12; 1988, ch. 752, § 3; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 39-42; 1989, ch. 523, § 212.

Cross-References. Deposits and disbursement of funds, § 63-1-137.

Disposition of fines and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

License renewals, § 63-1-107.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-12-122. Reissuance of license after revocation or suspension.

The board, by an affirmative vote of three (3), at any time after suspension or revocation of a license for good and sufficient cause, may reissue a license to the person affected, conferring upon the person all the rights and privileges pertaining to the practice of veterinary medicine.

Any person to whom such license may be reissued shall pay the same fee as upon the issuance of the original license.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 22; T.C.A., § 63-1222.

63-12-123. Issuance of duplicate license.

The board may issue a duplicate license to replace one that has been lost or destroyed or where a name change is requested, for a fee as set by the board.

Each duplicate license shall have the word “Duplicate” typed or printed across its face.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 23; T.C.A., § 63-1223; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 78.

63-12-124. Denial, suspension or revocation of license — Investigation — Immunity of informants.

The board, pursuant to the procedure prescribed in this section, has the power to deny, suspend or revoke any license or to otherwise discipline an applicant or licensee who is found guilty by the board of one (1) or more of the following:

Willful or repeated violation of any provisions of this chapter or any rules of the board;

Fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license to practice veterinary medicine, or presenting to the board dishonest or fraudulent evidence of qualification or fraud or deception in the process of examination for the purpose of securing a license;

The willful failure to display a license;

Fraud, deception, misrepresentation, dishonest or illegal practices in or connected with the practice of veterinary medicine in any of its branches;

Willfully making any misrepresentation in the inspection of food for human consumption;

Fraudulently issuing or using any health certificate, vaccination certificate, inspection certificate, test chart or other blank form used in the practice of veterinary medicine to the dissemination of animal disease, transportation of diseased animals or the sale of inedible products of animal origin for human consumption;

Fraud or dishonesty in applying, treating or reporting on tuberculin, diagnostic or other biological test;

Failure to keep the equipment and premises of the business establishment in a clean and sanitary condition;

Refusing to permit the board or any legal representative of the board to inspect the business premises of the licensee during regular business hours;

Circulating knowingly untrue, fraudulent, misleading or deceptive advertising;

Gross malpractice or a pattern of continued or repeated malpractice, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of veterinary medical practice;

Unprofessional or unethical conduct or engaging in practices in connection with the practice of veterinary medicine that are in violation of the standards of professional conduct as defined in this section or prescribed by the rules of the board;

Conduct reflecting unfavorably upon the profession of veterinary medicine;

The willful making of any false statement as to a material matter in any oath or affidavit that is required by this chapter;

Revocation by another state of a license to practice veterinary medicine in that state, in which case the record of such revocation shall be conclusive evidence;

Conviction on a charge of cruelty to animals;

Conviction of a felony under federal or state law involving use, misuse, possession or sale of any controlled substance or controlled substance analogue;

Conviction of a felony in the courts of this state, or of any other state, territory or country that, if committed in this state, would be a felony;

The record of conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction shall be sufficient evidence for disciplinary action to be taken as may be considered proper by the board. For the purpose of this chapter, a conviction shall be considered to be a conviction that has been upheld by the highest appellate court having jurisdiction or a conviction upon which the time for filing an appeal has passed; and

A record of conviction upon charges that involve the unlawful practice of veterinary medicine; and based upon such record of conviction, without any other testimony, the board may take temporary disciplinary action even though an appeal for review by a higher court may be pending;

Permitting or allowing another to use the licensee's license for the purpose of treating or offering to treat sick, injured or affected animals;

Engaging in the practice of veterinary medicine under a false or assumed name or the impersonation of another practitioner of a like, similar or different name;

Has been guilty of employing or permitting any person who does not hold a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state to perform work that, under this chapter, can lawfully be done only by persons holding such license and permitted by law to practice veterinary medicine in this state. It shall be conclusively presumed that any unlicensed person, if employed by a licensed person, was employed for such purpose if the unlicensed person has attended any school of veterinary medicine or surgery, accredited or otherwise, for a period of over thirty (30) days;

Addiction to the habitual use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics or other stimulants to such an extent as to incapacitate the applicant or licensee from the performance of the applicant's or the licensee's professional obligations and duties;

Professional incompetence;

Having been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and the disabilities of such person not having been restored or the voluntary commitment or admission to a state hospital or other mental institution. The record of adjudication, judgment, order or voluntary commitment is conclusive evidence of such mental illness; and upon receipt of a certified copy of any such adjudication, judgment, order or record of voluntary commitment by the board, it may suspend the license of the person so adjudicated or committed;

Failure to report, as required by law, or making false report of, any contagious or infectious disease as referred to under the United States department of agriculture (USDA) standards for accreditation of veterinarians in Tennessee and other states;

Has been found guilty of using biologicals or other drugs that have deteriorated or after the expiration date of that particular lot or serial number;

Has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance or any other drug not in the course of the accepted practice of veterinary medicine; or

Practicing veterinary medicine without establishing and maintaining a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship.

The board may, on its own motion, cause to be investigated any report indicating that a veterinarian is or may be in violation of this chapter.

Any person who in good faith shall report to the board any information that a veterinarian is or may be in violation of any provisions of this chapter shall not be subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 24; T.C.A., § 63-1224; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 14; 2012, ch. 848, § 76; 2016, ch. 819, § 4; 2018, ch. 745, § 29.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Criminal background checks, § 63-1-116.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-12-125. Administrative procedures.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, shall apply to all proceedings of the board and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 25; T.C.A., § 63-1225; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 15.

63-12-126, 63-12-127.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 63-12-126, 63-12-127 (Acts 1967, ch. 80, §§ 26, 27; T.C.A., §§ 63-1226, 63-1227), concerning procedure in disciplinary actions, were repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 16. For new provisions, see § 63-12-125.

63-12-128. Disciplinary orders against violators — Judicial review.

The board has the authority to enter an order to discipline any person, corporation or other similar organization, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, who or which, after proper hearing, has been found guilty by the board of a violation of one (1) or more provisions of this chapter or any rule of the board. The board, based upon the evidence and its findings of fact, may enter its final order, which may include one (1) or more of the following provisions:

Suspend or limit the right to practice veterinary medicine in this state;

Suspend or limit the right to hold a certificate or premises permit in this state;

Revoke the license to practice veterinary medicine. Following revocation of such license, the licensee may be relicensed at the discretion of the board with or without examination;

Impose judgment and penalties, but suspend enforcement thereof and place the licensee or license applicant, certificate holder or certificate applicant, premises permit holder or premises permit applicant on probation;

Suspend the imposition of judgment and penalties;

Refuse to issue a new license, certificate or premises permit;

Withhold any license, certificate or premises permit, either permanently or for a period of time, when the same, has not been delivered;

Suspend or limit the right to own or operate a veterinary facility in this state; or

Take such other action in relation to discipline as the board in its discretion may deem proper.

Immediately upon entry of the final order by the board, a copy thereof shall be delivered to the respondent and the respondent's counsel, if any, either personally or by registered or certified mail.

Judicial review of orders of the board may be had by writ of certiorari or as otherwise provided by the laws of this state.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 28; T.C.A., § 63-1228; Acts 1996, ch. 771, § 1; 1996, ch. 773, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 106, §§ 5-7; 2010, ch. 1043, §§ 10, 11.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Rules and regulations regarding sanctions for violations, § 63-1-146.

63-12-129. Enforcement.

The enforcement of the laws and rules of the board regulating the practicing of veterinary medicine in this state is primarily vested in the board, who may have the following powers and duties:

To employ investigators, counsel and clerical assistance or any other necessary personnel;

To inspect all veterinary facilities to determine sanitary conditions, physical equipment, methods of operation, keeping of records, etc. This inspection shall be by a member of the board or a licensed veterinarian representing the board;

To inspect licenses; and

To conduct investigations of all alleged violations.

The powers granted to the board shall not curtail or in any manner affect or eliminate the duties, efforts and assistance of the department of health in the enforcement of this chapter.

All expenses, compensation or fees incurred in connection with enforcement duties and powers shall be paid from the funds of the board and in all respects treated as other expenses of the board, subject to this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 29; T.C.A., § 63-1229; Acts 1996, ch. 771, § 4; 1996, ch. 773, § 3.

63-12-130. Prosecution of violators.

The state and county prosecuting attorneys shall prosecute all persons charged with the violation of any of this chapter or rules of the board.

The secretary-treasurer of the board, or other person employed or designated by the board, shall assist the prosecuting attorneys by furnishing them evidence of such violations whenever the board comes into possession of same.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 30; T.C.A., § 63-1230.

63-12-131. Fraudulent filing of license or diploma.

Any person filing or attempting to file as the person's own the diploma or license of another, a forged or fictitious license or diploma or certificate or forged affidavit or identification commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 31; T.C.A., § 63-1231; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 85.

Cross-References. Forgery, § 39-14-114.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

63-12-132. Enjoining violations.

In addition to the penalties herein provided in this chapter, the board may institute legal proceedings to enjoin the violation of this chapter or rules of the board in any court of competent jurisdiction; and such court may grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining the violation thereof.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 32; T.C.A., § 63-1232.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-12-133. Exemptions.

This chapter shall not be construed as applying to:

Students in schools or colleges of veterinary medicine when in performance of duties or actions assigned by their instructors or when working under the immediate supervision of a licensed veterinarian;

Any lawfully qualified veterinarian residing in another state or country, when meeting in consultation with a licensed veterinarian of this state, who:

Does not open an office or appoint a place to do business within this state;

Does not print or use letterhead or business cards reflecting addresses in this state;

Does not establish answering services or advertise the existence of a practice's address within this state; and

Practices veterinary medicine as a consultant while rendering services directly to the public, under the direction of and in consultation with licensees of this state, for less than twelve (12) days per calendar year.

Any veterinarian in the employ of a state agency or the United States government while actually engaged in the performance of the veterinarian's official duties; however, this exemption shall not apply to such person when the person is not engaged in carrying out the person's official duties or is not working at the installations for which the person's services were engaged;

Prevent any person or the person's regular employee from administering to the ills and injuries of the person's own animals, including, but not limited to, castration of animals and dehorning of cattle, unless title has been transferred or employment provided for the purpose of circumventing this law;

State agencies, accredited schools, institutions, foundations, business corporations or associations, physicians licensed to practice medicine and surgery in all its branches, graduate doctors of veterinary medicine or persons under the direct supervision thereof, who or which conduct experiments and scientific research on animals in the development of pharmaceuticals, biologicals, serums or methods of treatment or techniques for the diagnosis or treatment of human ailments, or when engaged in the study and development of methods and techniques directly or indirectly applicable to the problems of the practice of veterinary medicine;

Veterinary aides, nurses, laboratory technicians or other employees of a licensed veterinarian who administer medication or render auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible supervision of such licensed veterinarian;

Any person gratuitously treating animals in cases of emergency; provided, that the person does not claim to be a veterinarian or use any title or degree appertaining to the practice thereof;

Any merchant or manufacturer selling at the merchant's or manufacturer's regular place of business medicines, feed, appliances or other products used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases. This shall not be construed to authorize the sale of medicines or biologicals that must be obtained by a prescription from a veterinarian, but shall only include the right to sell those medicines that are classified as proprietary and that are commonly known as over-the-counter medicines;

Any person advising with respect to or performing acts that the board by rule has prescribed as accepted livestock management practice;

Any person or such person's employees when removing an embryo from the person's own food animal for the purpose of transplanting or cryopreserving such embryo; and

The use of any manual procedure for the testing of pregnancy in bovine animals when performed by a farmer as defined in § 67-6-207(e)(1), (3), (4) and (5), only if:

Such farmer testing for pregnancy is not compensated by the person who owns such animals, other than by the exchange of services for or the use of equipment by such farmer performing the pregnancy test; and

The results of such testing are for the owner's use only and not to affect commerce.

The operations known as castrating and dehorning are not regarded as practicing veterinary surgery, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit anyone from castrating or dehorning any wild or domestic animal.

For the purposes of this chapter, the practice of veterinary medicine shall not include the artificial insemination of livestock, as the term livestock is defined in § 43-1-114. The practice of artificial insemination shall be considered an accepted livestock management practice.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 33; T.C.A., § 63-1233; Acts 2006, ch. 532, § 1; 2010, ch. 804, §§ 3-5; 2014, ch. 568, § 5; 2017, ch. 274, § 1; 2018, ch. 679, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d).

The 2018 amendment deleted former (d) which read: “(d) For the purposes of this chapter, the practice of veterinary medicine does not include massage therapy to animals, which means the manipulation of the soft tissues of the animal body with the intention of positively affecting the health and well-being of the animal. This therapy does not include the diagnosis, treatment, correction, alleviation, or prevention of any animal disease, illness, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental condition. This subsection (d) shall expire on July 1, 2018.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 274, § 2. May 4, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 679, § 7. July 1, 2018 at 12:01 a.m.

63-12-134. Lien for services.

Every licensed veterinarian has a lien on each animal or pet treated, boarded or cared for by the veterinarian while in the veterinarian's custody and under contract with the owner of such animal or pet for payment of charges for treatment, board or care of such animal or pet. Such veterinarian has the right to retain such animal or pet until such charges are paid.

If the charges due for the services named in this section are not paid within ten (10) days after demand for the charges due on the owner of such animal or pet, in person, or by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested, addressed to the owner at the address given when such animal or pet is delivered, and the receipt has been returned by the United States postal authorities, such animal or pet shall be deemed to be abandoned and the licensed veterinarian is authorized to sell the animal or pet either at public or private sale and if the veterinarian does not succeed in selling such animal or pet within ten (10) days, then the veterinarian is authorized to dispose of such animal or pet in any manner that the veterinarian deems proper or turn the animal or pet over to the nearest humane society or dog pound in the area for disposal as such custodian deems proper.

An animal shall also be considered abandoned by its owner if the owner gives a licensed veterinarian a false address and telephone number and the demand mailed by the licensed veterinarian by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, is returned undelivered. Under the circumstances provided in this subdivision (b)(2), the licensed veterinarian may consider the animal abandoned when the veterinarian receives notice that the mailed demand is undeliverable; and the licensed veterinarian may dispose of the animal as provided in subdivision (b)(1). As an alternative, the licensed veterinarian may turn the animal or pet over to the nearest humane society or animal control shelter in the area for disposition of the animal as such custodian deems proper without first offering the animal or pet for sale.

The giving of notice to the owners as provided in subsection (b) relieves the licensed veterinarian or any custodian to whom such animal or pet may be given of any further liability for disposal.

Failure of the owner of any such animal or pet to receive the demand by registered or certified mail provided for in this section does not render the licensed veterinarian liable to the owner of such animal or pet for the disposal thereof in any manner provided in this section.

When any animal or pet is sold as authorized in this section to satisfy a lien for any of the services enumerated, any moneys realized from the sale, less such charges and any expenses incurred in making the demand for payment thereof in connection with the sale, shall be paid to the owner of the animal or pet.

No legal proceeding for the enforcement of the lien created by this law is necessary concerning abandoned animals as defined in subsection (b), other than compliance with the requirements provided in this section.

Acts 1967, ch. 80, § 34; T.C.A., § 63-1234; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 17; 1997, ch. 204, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

63-12-135. Licensed veterinary technicians — Unauthorized practice.

The board shall examine and license veterinary technicians and has the same authority in the regulation, examination and qualification of licensed veterinary technicians as it has under this chapter for the practice of veterinary medicine and veterinarians.

Any licensed veterinarian may assign to a licensed veterinary technician regularly employed by the veterinarian any task or procedure to be performed for which the veterinarian exercises responsible supervision and full responsibility except those procedures requiring professional judgment or skill as prescribed by board rule.

The fees provided in this chapter pertaining to applications, licensing and renewal for veterinarians also apply to licensed veterinary technicians.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person to use in connection with the person's name any designation intending to imply that the person is a veterinary technician or a licensed veterinary technician unless the person meets the requirements contained in this chapter.

The board may, on its own motion, cause to be investigated any report indicating that a licensed veterinary technician is or may be in violation of this chapter. Any person who in good faith reports to the board any information that a licensed veterinary technician is or may be in violation of any provisions of this chapter is not subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof.

Acts 1972, ch. 688, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1235; Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 18; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1999, ch. 375, §§ 5, 7, 9-11; 2013, ch. 440, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for unlicensed practice, § 63-12-119.

63-12-136. [Reserved.]

It is unlawful for any licensed veterinarian to practice veterinary medicine as an employee of any person other than a veterinarian duly licensed in this state or a veterinary facility operated at all times under the direct medical supervision of a veterinarian duly licensed in this state.

No person, corporation or other similar organization, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, other than a veterinarian duly licensed in this state, shall own or operate a veterinary facility within this state, except as follows:

Any person, corporation or other similar organization, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, shall apply for and receive a premises permit before the commencement of operations at the veterinary facility; and

The owner of the veterinary facility shall not restrict or interfere with medically appropriate veterinary diagnostic or treatment decisions by the licensed veterinarians employed at the veterinary facility.

The following are exempt from this section:

A veterinarian employed by a person, corporation or other similar organization, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, to treat such employer's animals;

A veterinarian employed by an official agency of the federal or state government or any subdivision thereof; and

A veterinarian employed by any licensed research facility.

Acts 1983, ch. 57, § 19; 1996, ch. 771, § 3; 1996, ch. 773, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. A court could find that the board of veterinary medical examiners still had authority to enforce a facilities permit system for non-veterinarians under T.C.A. § 63-12-137(b)(1), even if T.C.A. §§ 63-12-139 and 63-12-140 were repealed, OAG 02-007, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/4/02).

63-12-138. Peer review committees — Immunity — Confidentiality of information.

As used in this section, “peer review committee” or “committee” means any committee, board, commission or other entity constituted by any statewide veterinary medical association, or local veterinary medical association or local veterinary association for the purpose of receiving and evaluating veterinary acts of other veterinarians or veterinary auxiliary personnel.

Any veterinarian who serves on any peer review committee or on any other committee shall be immune from liability with respect to any action taken by the veterinarian in good faith and without malice as a member of such committee, board, commission or other entity.

Veterinarians, licensed veterinary technicians and members of boards of directors of any publicly supported or privately supported animal health care facility, or any other individual appointed to any committee, as described in subsection (a), shall be immune from liability to any client, patient, individual or organization for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any such committee or for damages resulting from any decision, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by such committees undertaken or performed within the scope or functions of the duties of such committees, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data furnished to any such peer review committee or other entity and any findings, conclusions or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of such committee or other entity are privileged. The records and proceedings of any such committee or other entity are confidential and shall be used by such committee or other entity and the members thereof only in the exercise of the proper functions of the committee or other entity and shall not become public record nor be available for court subpoena or discovery proceedings. Nothing contained in this subsection (d) applies to records, documents or information otherwise available from original sources, such records, documents or information not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil proceedings solely due to presentation to the committee.

Acts 1987, ch. 293, § 1; 1999, ch. 375, § 8.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.